Missouri, session 2026, HB2378.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 311.630 and 320.230, RSMo, are repealed and two new sections
enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 311.630 and 320.230, to read as follows:
311.630. 1. The supervisor of alcohol and tobacco control and employees to be
selected and designated as peace officers by the supervisor of alcohol and tobacco control are
hereby declared to be peace officers of the state of Missouri, with full power and authority to
make arrests and searches and seizures only for violations of the provisions of this chapter
relating to intoxicating liquors, [and] sections 407.924 to 407.934 relating to tobacco
products, or when exigent circumstances that present an immediate threat of bodily
harm to any person exist, and to serve any process connected with the enforcement of such
laws. The peace officers so designated shall have been previously appointed and qualified
under the provisions of section 311.620 and shall be required to hold a valid peace officer
license pursuant to chapter 590.
2. The supervisor of alcohol and tobacco control shall furnish such peace officers
with credentials showing their authority and a special badge, which they shall carry on their
person at all times while on duty. The names of the peace officers so designated shall be
made a matter of public record in the office of the supervisor of alcohol and tobacco control.
3. All fees for the arrest and transportation of persons arrested and for the service of
writs and process shall be the same as provided by law in criminal proceedings and shall be
taxed as costs.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2378 2
320.230. 1. The state fire marshal shall conduct investigations and may conduct
hearings into the cause, origin, or circumstances of fire losses and shall cooperate with the
appropriate fire or police officials of this state or its political subdivisions in investigations of
the cause, origin or circumstances of fires, explosions or related occurrences involving the
possibility of arson or related offenses.
2. The state fire marshal and the marshal's paid investigators who have attained
proper certification as peace officers pursuant to chapter 590 as approved by the director of
the department of public safety shall be deemed to be peace officers and shall notify the local
law enforcement agency of the existence of the investigators and shall have the power of
arrest for all offenses incident to the investigation of the cause, origin or circumstances of
fires, fireworks, explosions or like occurrences involving the possibility of arson, or related
offenses, and in connection with any offenses when aiding and assisting the sheriff of any
county or the chief of police of any municipality, or their designated representatives, at their
request, or when exigent circumstances that present an immediate threat of bodily harm
to any person exist.
✔